District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.62

Establishment of Opportunity Account Office.

The Mayor shall establish in the executive branch an office to be known as the Opportunity Account Office. The office shall:

(1)

Provide eligible families and individuals with an opportunity to establish opportunity accounts;

(2)

Provide that the opportunity account shall be established by an approved financial institution and administered by an approved organization;

(3)

Provide incentives to encourage participation in the program; and

(4)

Require that money deposited into an opportunity account shall be used only for approved purposes.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 3, 48 DCR 1240

History

This section is referenced in § 1-307.61.

Section References